Connecticut, session 2026, SB00504.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) There is established a working group
2 to study the laws of criminal procedure of this state. Such study shall
3 include, at a minimum, a review of title 54 of the general statutes for the
4 purpose of recommending legislative changes to said title. The working
5 group shall consist of the following members who have expertise in
6 laws of criminal procedure: (1) One appointed by the speaker of the
7 House of Representatives; (2) one appointed by the president pro
8 tempore of the Senate; (3) one appointed by the majority leader of the
9 House of Representatives; (4) one appointed by the majority leader of
10 the Senate; (5) one appointed by the minority leader of the House of
11 Representatives; and (6) one appointed by the minority leader of the
12 Senate. The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
13 General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to the judiciary
14 shall serve as the administrative staff for the working group. Not later
SB504 / File No. 594 1

SB504 File No. 594
15 than January 1, 2027, the working group shall submit a report on its
16 findings and recommendations to the joint standing committee of the
17 General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to the
18 judiciary, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the
19 general statutes. The working group shall terminate on the date that it
20 submits such report or January 1, 2027, whichever is later.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
JUD Joint Favorable
SB504 / File No. 594 2

SB504 File No. 594
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill creates working group to study criminal procedure laws
resulting in no fiscal impact to the state because the working group has
the expertise needed to meet the requirements of the bill.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB504 / File No. 594 3

SB504 File No. 594
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 504
AN ACT CONCERNING A STUDY OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE
LAWS OF THIS STATE.